dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX B 0 bekungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bekungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bekungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bekungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bekungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bekuyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bekuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bekw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bel/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bel/id o RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beli/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beling/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 belinga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 belingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beliyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 belizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 belu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 belung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 belunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 belungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 belungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beluyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 beluzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 belw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 ben/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beng/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beng/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 benga/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 benging/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 benginga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bengingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bengiyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bengizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 beni/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bening/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 beninga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 beningayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beningayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beningayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beningazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beningazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beningazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beniyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 benizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bes/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 besi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 besing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 besinga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 besingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 besingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 besingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 besingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 besingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 besingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 besiyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 besizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bew/id [ae] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bew/id o RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bewu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bewung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bewunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bewungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bewungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bewungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bewungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bewungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bewungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bewuyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bewuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bey/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beyi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 beying/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 beyinga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 beyingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beyingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beyingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beyingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beyingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beyingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beyiyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 beyizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 beyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bez/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bezi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 bezing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bezinga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 bezingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bezingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bezingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bezingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bezingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bezingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 beziyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bezizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bezo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bu/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 bu/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 bung/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 bunga/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 bungazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 buyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 buzo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 bw/di [ae]
PFX B 0 bw/d [ae] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 e/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 e/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 el/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 el [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ela [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eli/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eling/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elinga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eliyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 elizo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 en/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 en [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ena [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eng/iy [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
