dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
abuzana/BC
ahlukana/BC
ahlulela/BC
ala/BC
alela/BC
alusa/BC
amuka/BC
ana/BC
andula/BC
angama/BC
anyula/BC
aphusa/BC
azelela/BC
babala/BC
babela/BC
bala/BC
baluleka/BC
bambela/BC
bandakanya/BC
bandula/BC
bangula/BC
baza/BC
bebethela/BC
bekela/BC
belesa/BC
benga/BC
beza/BC
bhacisa/BC
bhadlaza/BC
bhaklaza/BC
bhalisa/BC
bhanda/BC
bhansela/BC
bhebhetheka/BC
bhedla/BC
bheja/BC
bhekisa/BC
bhensa/BC
bhidlika/BC
bhinca/BC
bhocobala/BC
bhodoza/BC
bhola/BC
bhova/BC
bhubhisa/BC
bhuduzela/BC
bhula/BC
bhuntsha/BC
bhuza/BC
bikela/BC
bindwa/BC
bisha/BC
bizwa/BCY
bolela/BC
bonda/BC
bongela/BC
bonwa/BCY
botha/BC
buhluka/BC
bukisa/BC
bumba/BC
bungana/BC
buswa/BCY
buya/BC
buyisa/BC
buzela/BC
cabangela/BC
camela/BC
canuzela/BC
cashisa/BC
cathamela/BC
caza/BC
ceka/BC
chachamba/BC
chapha/BC
chathazela/BC
chelela/BC
chichima/BC
chitheka/BC
chochobala/BC
chosha/BC
chusha/BC
cija/BC
cima/BC
cinana/BC
cisha/BC
cobela/BC
cola/BC
cosha/BC
cucuza/BC
cupha/BC
cwa/BC
cweba/BC
cwenga/BC
dabukela/BC
dakisa/BC
dambuza/BC
dansisa/BC
deda/BC
delela/BC
diba/BC
dika/BC
dikliza/BC
dindiliza/BC
dingisa/BC
dixa/BC
dlanga/BC
dlebeleka/BC
dlidliza/BC
dliwa/BC
dlubha/BC
dlulisa/BC
dlwengula/BC
dondolozela/BC
duba/BC
dudula/BC
dukelana/BC
dumaza/BC
dunguza/BC
duva/BC
dweba/BC
ebana/BC
ebuza/BC
edlula/BC
efuza/BC
ehla/BCY
ehlula/BC
elama/BC
emana/BC
emukeleka/BC
encika/BC
enelisa/BC
enqabela/BC
enza/BC
ephepha/BC
esaba/BC
esuka/BC
ethemba/BC
ethwesa/BC
eyama/BC
fahlaza/BC
fanwa/BCY
feza/BC
fikisa/BC
fisa/BC
fudumala/BC
fulathela/BC
funda/BC
funza/BC
gabha/BC
gaklaza/BC
ganga/BC
gawula/BC
gcinwa/BCY
gcwalisa/BC
geleza/BC
gezwa/BCY
gina/BC
goda/BC
golomba/BC
govuza/BC
gqashuka/BC
gqokisa/BC
guba/BC
gudlana/BC
gulukudela/BC
guquka/BC
gwaza/BC
gwiliza/BC
gxisha/BC
hala/BC
haqa/BC
hhuhha/BC
hlabela/BC
hlakula/BC
hlambulula/BC
hlanganyela/BC
hlaza/BC
hlenga/BC
hlinzeka/BC
hlola/BC
hloniza/BC
hlumba/BC
hlusuka/BC
hlwela/BC
hoxa/BC
humusha/BC
jaha/BC
jika/BC
joka/BC
julukela/BC
kapa/BC
khafula/BC
khalala/BC
khandla/BC
khanyisa/BC
khathalwa/BCY
khela/BC
khexa/BC
khiza/BC
kholakala/BC
khonkotha/BC
khoza/BC
khukhumeza/BC
khuluma/BC
khumbuza/BC
khushuka/BC
khwehlela/BC
kipita/BC
kleza/BC
kopa/BC
lahla/BC
lamba/BC
langazela/BC
lekelela/BC
leza/BC
lindela/BC
lobela/BC
longa/BC
lulama/BC
lunga/BC
makala/BC
matana/BC
mboza/BC
mema/BC
mimilita/BC
mosa/BC
muhluza/BC
nala/BC
ncibilika/BC
ncoma/BC
ndwaza/BC
nensa/BC
ngambuza/BC
ngcwelisa/BC
ngqavuza/BC
ngula/BC
nina/BC
nkwankwaza/BC
nqaba/BC
nqekuza/BC
nquma/BC
ntantatheka/BC
ntuleka/BC
nwela/BC
nxusa/BC
nyanga/BC
nyaza/BC
nyomuka/BC
nyula/BC
ojwayela/BC
onakala/BC
ongeza/BC
osula/BCY
ozela/BC
phahla/BC
phalaza/BC
phanga/BC
phaquka/BC
phathwa/BC
phekwa/BCY
phendukela/BC
phephezela/BC
phethuka/BC
phila/BC
phisa/BC
phola/BC
photha/BC
phuka/BC
phumula/BC
phunyuza/BC
phuthula/BC
potoza/BC
qagulisa/BC
qalwa/BCY
qaqamba/BC
qedela/BC
qethuka/BC
qhaya/BC
qhikiza/BC
qhubeka/BC
qhuma/BC
qhwaga/BC
qiniseka/BC
qondakala/BC
qopha/BC
qukatha/BC
ququda/BC
sabeka/BC
salwa/BCY
sayinela/BC
sekela/BC
seza/BC
shaka/BC
shayana/BC
shefa/BC
shesheleza/BC
shikilisa/BC
shipha/BC
shiyana/BC
shoshozela/BC
shunqa/BC
shwabadela/BC
sibekela/BC
silela/BC
singa/BC
sisa/BC
sizwa/BCY
sondezela/BC
sukela/BC
susa/BC
swelakala/BC
tata/BC
thaba/BC
thana/BC
thandeka/BC
thathelana/BC
thela/BC
thembuza/BC
thenjwa/BCY
thintana/BC
thokoza/BC
tholwa/BCY
thubeleza/BC
thuna/BC
thunukala/BC
thuthuzela/BC
toka/BC
tsheleka/BC
tubha/BC
vama/BC
vikela/BC
viva/BC
vuleka/BC
vuna/BC
vutha/BC
wahlela/BC
wina/BC
wula/BC
xathuka/BC
xeka/BC
xhaphaza/BC
xhumana/BC
xolelana/BC
xubha/BC
yabula/BC
yavuza/BC
yenga/BC
yingaza/BC
yona/BC
zaca/BC
zamula/BC
zibula/BC
zinda/BC
zoba/BC
zuka/BC
PFX C 0 ba/BY [^aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 lu/BY [^aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 ngaba/BY [^aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngalu/BY [^aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngaw/BY [ae] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngi/BY [^aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 sabw/BY [ae] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 san/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sawa/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 w/BY o OBJ
